North Dakota, session 69, SB2005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, to the Indian affairs commission for the purpose of defraying the expenses of
the Indian affairs commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as
follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $948,903 $49,040 $997,943
New and vacant FTE pool 0 10,462 10,462
Operating expenses 267,718 12,228 279,946
Total general fund $1,216,621 $71,730 $1,288,351
Full-time equivalent positions 4.00 0.00 4.00
SECTION 2. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The Indian
affairs commission may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.

S. B. NO. 2005 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2005.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 6 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State